Colorado statutes. TITLE 7 Corporations and Associations
PART 14
FOREIGN COOPERATIVES

7-58-1401. Authority to transact business or conduct activities required.

Part 8 of article 90 of this title, providing for the transaction of business or the conduct of activities by foreign entities, applies to foreign limited cooperative associations.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 811, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.

7-58-1402. Registered agent - service of process.

Part 7 of article 90 of this title, providing for registered agents and service of process, applies to foreign limited cooperative associations.

Source:

L. 2011:

Entire article added, (SB 11-191), ch. 197, p. 811, § 1, effective April 2, 2012.